th: ประเภทโซ่: BBB; High test (HT); ขดลวดที่ผ่านการทดสอบแล้ว; เหล็กสเตนเลส (SS); อื่นๆ
it: Tipo di catena: BBB; Ad elevato numero di ottani (HT); Bobina di prova; Acciaio inossidabile (SS); Altro
cs: Typ řetězu: BBB; Vysokopevnostní (HT); Měřicí cívka; Nerezová ocel (SS); Jiné
sl-SI: Vrsta verižice: BBB; HT; Klasična; Nerjavno jeklo (SS); Drugo
hu: Lánc típusa: BBB; Nagy teherbírású lánc; Próbatekercs; Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ reťaze: BBB; HT; Reťaz; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ (SS); Iné
ru: Тип цепи: BBB; Строгий тест (HT); Катушка для проверки; Нержавеющая сталь; Другое
nb: Kjedetype: BBB; Høy test (HT); Proof coil; Rustfritt stål (SS); Annet
tr: Zincir Tipi: BBB; High test (HT); Dayanıklı bobin; Paslanmaz çelik (SS); Diğer
lt-LT: Grandinės tipas: BBB; Pramoninė (HT); Standartinė ritės; Nerūdijantysis plienas (SS); Kita
pt-BR: Tipo de corrente: BBB; Teste de carga elevado (HT); Bobina de prova; Aço inoxidável (SS); Outro
hr-HR: Vrsta lanca: BBB; Iznimno čvrsti (HT); Za opću upotrebu; Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
nl: Kettingtype: BBB; Hoge test (HT); Proof coil; Roestvrij staal (rvs); Andere
ja: チェーンの種類: BBB; 強力 (HT); プルーフコイル; ステンレススチール (SS); その他
el: Τύπος αλυσίδας: BBB; Υψηλής δοκιμής (HT); Proof coil; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας (SS); Άλλο
ko: 체인 유형: BBB; 하이 테스트(HT); 프루프 코일; 스테인레스 스틸(SS); 기타
zh-TW: 鏈條類型: BBB; 高測試 (HT); 檢驗線圈; 不銹鋼 (SS); 其他
es: Tipo de cadena: BBB; Alta resistencia; Bobina de prueba; Acero inoxidable; Otros
en: Chain type: BBB; High test (HT); Proof coil; Stainless steel (SS); Other
bg-BG: Тип верига: BBB; Висок тест (HT); Proof coil; Неръждаема стомана (SS); Други
da: Kædetype: BBB; Høj test (HT); Proof-spole; Rustfrit stål (SS); Andet
fi: Ketjutyyppi: BBB; Valioluokan (HT); Kela; Ruostumaton teräs (SS); Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de corrente: BBB; Teste alto (HT); Aço de carbono; Aço inoxidável (SS); Outro
pl: Typ łańcucha: BBB; Wysokiej wytrzymałości (HT); Cewka próbna; SS (stal nierdzewna); Inne
de: Kettentyp: BBB; Schwerlast; Glieder; Edelstahl; Sonstiges
vi: Loại dây xích: BBB; Kiểm tra cao (HT); Cuộn dây cơ bản; Thép không gỉ (SS); Khác
sv: Kedjetyp: BBB; Högpresterande (HT); Proof coil; Rostfritt stål (SS); Övrigt
fr: Type de chaîne: BBB; Test élevé; Bobine d'épreuve; Acier inoxydable; Autre
ro-RO: Tip lanț: BBB; Durabilitate ridicată (HT); Lanț industrial cu zale rotunde obișnuit; Oțel inoxidabil (SS); Altele
zh-CN: 链条类型: BBB; 高级测试 (HT); 检验线圈; 不锈钢 (SS); 其他